Massachusetts, session 194th, S774.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 9 of chapter 258 of the acts of 2014 is hereby amended by striking
out, in line 34, the figure “14” and inserting in place thereof the following figure:- 30.
SECTION 2. Section 19 of said chapter 258 is hereby amended by striking out, in line 24,
the figure “14” and inserting in place thereof the following figure:- 30.
SECTION 3. Section 21 of said chapter 258 is hereby amended by striking out, in line 35,
the figure “14” and inserting in place thereof the following figure:- 30.
SECTION 4. Section 23 of said chapter 258 is hereby amended by striking out, in line 35,
the figure “14” and inserting in place thereof the following figure:- 30.
of 2

SECTION 5. Section 25 of said chapter 258 is hereby amended by striking out, in line 35,
the figure “14” and inserting in place thereof the following figure:- 30.
SECTION 6. Section 27 of said chapter 258 is hereby amended by striking out, in line 32,
the figure “14” and inserting in place thereof the following figure:- 30.
of 2